Utah statutes.
38-1a-211.   Limit on notice effect of document filing in the registry.

The filing of a document in the registry is not intended to give notice to all persons of the content of the document within the meaning of Section 57-3-102 and does not constitute constructive notice of matters relating to real property to purchasers for value and without knowledge.

